Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-122
Sections; conveyances not affected.

Sections 76-101 to 76-123 shall not apply to acts which occurred or to conveyances which became effective before August 24, 1941, except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of section 76-107.

Laws 1941, c. 153, § 22, p. 599;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-1022;

R.S.1943, § 76-122;

Laws 1988, LB 657, § 2.

Savings clause does not operate to withdraw from courts the power to apply Uniform Property Act to transactions which occurred before act became effective. United States v. 12,800 Acres of Land in Hall County, 69 F.Supp. 767 (D. Neb. 1947).